Mississippi, session 2026, HB763.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  It shall be unlawful to sell or offer to sell any candy or food product that mimics any tobacco product.  A violation of this section shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for a first offense.  A second or subsequent violation of this section shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) and not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6) months, or both. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.